Utah statutes.
9-4-701.   Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1)  "Board" means the Housing Board created by this part.
(2)  "Fund" means the Olene Walker Housing Loan Fund created by this part.
(3)  "Rural" means any county in the state other than Utah, Salt Lake, Davis,
or Weber.
